Hawaii statutes.
[§328J‑5] Prohibition in sports
arenas, outdoor arenas, stadiums, and amphitheaters. Smoking shall be
prohibited in the enclosed or partially enclosed areas and in seating areas of
sports arenas, outdoor arenas, stadiums, and amphitheaters. [L 2006, c 295, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next